Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 19-811 is hereby amended to read as follows:
19-811. The sheriff shall have the charge and custody of the jail of his
the sheriff's county, and all the prisoners in the same such jail, and shall
keep such jail himself personally, or by his a deputy or jailer, for whose
acts he and his sureties official acts the sheriff and sureties of the
sheriff shall be liable.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 19-811 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED ________________________________________
_______
Governor.